src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON O-LOGIF   !!≈ * **@CODE@** this lexicon is accessed only via other O-lexica, and not directly from OVERDUHAT. Thus, *logivihttaduhát, etc. is avoided.
         logi:logi#          JUSTDUHAT ;
         logi:logi#          DUHAT     ;
     logiokta:logi#okta#     JUSTDUHAT ;
     logiakta:logi#akta#     JUSTDUHAT ;
   logiguokte:logi#guokte#   JUSTDUHAT ;
   logigolbma:logi#golbma#   JUSTDUHAT ;
 loginjeallje:logi#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
 loginjeallja:logi#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
   logivihtta:logi#vihtta#   JUSTDUHAT ;
   logiguhtta:logi#guhtta#   JUSTDUHAT ;
    logičieža:logi#čieža#    JUSTDUHAT ;
    logigieža:logi#gieža#    JUSTDUHAT ;
   logigávcci:logi#gávcci#   JUSTDUHAT ;
    logiovcci:logi#ovcci#    JUSTDUHAT ;
     logiokta:logi#okta#     DUHAT     ;
     logiakta:logi#akta#     DUHAT     ;
   logiguokte:logi#guokte#   DUHAT     ;
   logigolbma:logi#golbma#   DUHAT     ;
 loginjeallje:logi#njeallje# DUHAT     ;
 loginjeallja:logi#njeallja# DUHAT     ;
   logivihtta:logi#vihtta#   DUHAT     ;
   logiguhtta:logi#guhtta#   DUHAT     ;
    logičieža:logi#čieža#    DUHAT     ;
    logigieža:logi#gieža#    DUHAT     ;
   logigávcci:logi#gávcci#   DUHAT     ;
    logiovcci:logi#ovcci#    DUHAT     ;



LEXICON O-NUPPELOT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Teens of thousands
     okta:okta#     O-NL ;
     akta:akta#     O-NL ;
   guokte:guokte#   O-NL ;
   golbma:golbma#   O-NL ;
 njeallje:njeallje# O-NL ;
 njeallja:njeallja# O-NL ;
   vihtta:vihtta#   O-NL ;
   guhtta:guhtta#   O-NL ;
    čieža:čieža#    O-NL ;
    gieža:gieža#    O-NL ;
   gávcci:gávcci#   O-NL ;
    ovcci:ovcci#    O-NL ;

LEXICON O-NUPPELOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
    nuppelohkái:nuppe#lohkái#    DUHAT ;
       nuppelot:nuppe#lot#       DUHAT ;
       nuppelot:nuppe#loh9#      DUHAT ;
 goalmmátlohkái:goalmmát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
    goalmmátlot:goalmmát#lot#    DUHAT ;
    goalmmátlot:goalmmát#loh9#   DUHAT ;
 njealjátlohkái:njealját#lohkái# DUHAT ;
    njealjátlot:njealját#lot#    DUHAT ;
    njealjátlot:njealját#loh9#   DUHAT ;
    viđátlohkái:viđát#lohkái#    DUHAT ;
       viđátlot:viđát#lot#       DUHAT ;
       viđátlot:viđát#loh9#      DUHAT ;
    guđátlohkái:guđát#lohkái#    DUHAT ;
       guđátlot:guđát#lot#       DUHAT ;
       guđátlot:guđát#loh9#      DUHAT ;
    viđatlohkái:viđat#lohkái#    DUHAT ;
       viđatlot:viđat#lot#       DUHAT ;
       viđatlot:viđat#loh9#      DUHAT ;
    guđatlohkái:guđat#lohkái#    DUHAT ;
       guđatlot:guđat#lot#       DUHAT ;
       guđatlot:guđat#loh9#      DUHAT ;
  čihččetlohkái:čihččet#lohkái#  DUHAT ;
     čihččetlot:čihččet#lot#     DUHAT ;
     čihččetlot:čihččet#loh9#    DUHAT ;
  gávccátlohkái:gávccát#lohkái#  DUHAT ;
     gávccátlot:gávccát#lot#     DUHAT ;
     gávccátlot:gávccát#loh9#    DUHAT ;
   ovccátlohkái:ovccát#lohkái#   DUHAT ;
      ovccátlot:ovccát#lot#      DUHAT ;
      ovccátlot:ovccát#loh9#     DUHAT ;
    logátlohkái:logát#lohkái#    DUHAT ;
       logátlot:logát#lot#       DUHAT ;
       logátlot:logát#loh9#      DUHAT ;




LEXICON O-2TO9CUO   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   guokte:guokte#   O-GCUO ;
   golbma:golbma#   O-GCUO ;
 njeallje:njeallje# O-GCUO ;
 njeallja:njeallja# O-GCUO ;
   vihtta:vihtta#   O-GCUO ;
   guhtta:guhtta#   O-GCUO ;
    čieža:čieža#    O-GCUO ;
    gieža:gieža#    O-GCUO ;
   gávcci:gávcci#   O-GCUO ;
    ovcci:ovcci#    O-GCUO ;

LEXICON O-GCUO   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
         čuođi:čuođi#          JUSTDUHAT  ; ! 100000
         čuođi:čuođi#          DUHAT      ; ! 100000
        čuohte:čuohte#         DUHAT      ; ! 100000
         čuođi:čuođi#          O-OKTAF    ; ! 101000
     čuođiokta:čuođi#okta#     JUSTDUHAT  ;
     čuođiakta:čuođi#akta#     JUSTDUHAT  ;
   čuođiguokte:čuođi#guokte#   JUSTDUHAT  ;
   čuođigolbma:čuođi#golbma#   JUSTDUHAT  ;
 čuođinjeallje:čuođi#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT  ;
 čuođinjeallja:čuođi#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT  ;
   čuođivihtta:čuođi#vihtta#   JUSTDUHAT  ;
   čuođiguhtta:čuođi#guhtta#   JUSTDUHAT  ;
    čuođičieža:čuođi#čieža#    JUSTDUHAT  ;
    čuođigieža:čuođi#gieža#    JUSTDUHAT  ;
   čuođigávcci:čuođi#gávcci#   JUSTDUHAT  ;
    čuođiovcci:čuođi#ovcci#    JUSTDUHAT  ;
     čuođiokta:čuođi#okta#     DUHAT      ;
     čuođiakta:čuođi#akta#     DUHAT      ;
   čuođiguokte:čuođi#guokte#   DUHAT      ;
   čuođigolbma:čuođi#golbma#   DUHAT      ;
 čuođinjeallje:čuođi#njeallje# DUHAT      ;
 čuođinjeallja:čuođi#njeallja# DUHAT      ;
   čuođivihtta:čuođi#vihtta#   DUHAT      ;
   čuođiguhtta:čuođi#guhtta#   DUHAT      ;
    čuođičieža:čuođi#čieža#    DUHAT      ;
    čuođigieža:čuođi#gieža#    DUHAT      ;
   čuođigávcci:čuođi#gávcci#   DUHAT      ;
    čuođiovcci:čuođi#ovcci#    DUHAT      ;
         čuođi:čuođi#          O-LOGIF    ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
         čuođi:čuođi#          O-2TO9LOG  ; ! 120000, 123000, ...
         čuođi:čuođi#          O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...


LEXICON DUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 duhát:duháh DUHATCASE ;


! -------------------------------------

LEXICON JUSTDUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@** for numerals going via 1000
             duhát:duhát#   UNDERDUHAT ; ! Thousand-and-something
     duháhat+A+Ord:duháha   DUHAHAT    ;
             duhát:duhát#   111TO119   ;
             duhát:duhát#   21TO99     ;
             duhát:duhát#   LOGIF      ;
 čuođis+CmpNP/None:čuohºtis OVCCIS_N   ;



! -----------------------------------------------

LEXICON OLD   !!≈ * **@CODE@** for the old counting thirteen hundred etc.
     okta:okta#     NLX ;
     akta:akta#     NLX ;
   guokte:guokte#   NLX ;
   golbma:golbma#   NLX ;
 njeallje:njeallje# NLX ;
 njeallja:njeallja# NLX ;
   vihtta:vihtta#   NLX ;
   guhtta:guhtta#   NLX ;
    čieža:čieža#    NLX ;
    gieža:gieža#    NLX ;
   gávcci:gávcci#   NLX ;
    ovcci:ovcci#    NLX ;

LEXICON NUPPELOHKAICUODI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
    nuppelohkái:nuppe#lohkái#    CUODICASE ;
       nuppelot:nuppe#lot#       CUODICASE ;
       nuppelot:nuppe#loh9#      CUODICASE ;
 goalmmátlohkái:goalmmát#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
    goalmmátlot:goalmmát#lot#    CUODICASE ;
    goalmmátlot:goalmmát#loh9#   CUODICASE ;
 njealjátlohkái:njealját#lohkái# CUODICASE ;
    njealjátlot:njealját#lot#    CUODICASE ;
    njealjátlot:njealját#loh9#   CUODICASE ;
    viđátlohkái:viđát#lohkái#    CUODICASE ;
       viđátlot:viđát#lot#       CUODICASE ;
       viđátlot:viđát#loh9#      CUODICASE ;
    guđátlohkái:guđát#lohkái#    CUODICASE ;
       guđátlot:guđát#lot#       CUODICASE ;
       guđátlot:guđát#loh9#      CUODICASE ;
    viđatlohkái:viđat#lohkái#    CUODICASE ;
       viđatlot:viđat#lot#       CUODICASE ;
       viđatlot:viđat#loh9#      CUODICASE ;
    guđatlohkái:guđat#lohkái#    CUODICASE ;
       guđatlot:guđat#lot#       CUODICASE ;
       guđatlot:guđat#loh9#      CUODICASE ;
  čihččetlohkái:čihččet#lohkái#  CUODICASE ;
     čihččetlot:čihččet#lot#     CUODICASE ;
     čihččetlot:čihččet#loh9#    CUODICASE ;
  gávccátlohkái:gávccát#lohkái#  CUODICASE ;
     gávccátlot:gávccát#lot#     CUODICASE ;
     gávccátlot:gávccát#loh9#    CUODICASE ;
   ovccátlohkái:ovccát#lohkái#   CUODICASE ;
      ovccátlot:ovccát#lot#      CUODICASE ;
      ovccátlot:ovccát#loh9#     CUODICASE ;
    logátlohkái:logát#lohkái#    CUODICASE ;
       logátlot:logát#lot#       CUODICASE ;
       logátlot:logát#loh9#      CUODICASE ;


! Underduhat, the numerals under 1000
! -----------------------------------


LEXICON UNDERDUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  the numerals under 1000
  ONLY_OKTA  ; !1
  OKTAF      ; ! 1, 11
  2TO9F      ; ! 2-9
  BARELOGIF  ; ! 10
  2TO9LOG    ; ! 20-90
  CUODI      ; ! 100
  2TO9CUO    ; ! 200-999
  1TO9CUODI  ;
  LOHKI      ;
  NUPPELOGIS ;


LEXICON ONLY_CMP   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                   okta:okºta OKTA ;
        akta+Num+Sg+Nom:akta  K    ;
                              NARE ;

LEXICON O-2TO9LOG   !!≈ * **@CODE@** All the child lexica of OVERDUHAT have the prefix O-. They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTDUHAT.
      guokte:guokte#        O-LOGIF   ;
      golbma:golbma#        O-LOGIF   ;
   golbmalot:golbma#lot#    DUHAT     ;
   golbmalot:golbma#lot#    JUSTDUHAT ;
    njeallje:njeallje#      O-LOGIF   ;
 njealljelot:njeallje#lot#  DUHAT     ;
 njealljelot:njeallje#lot#  JUSTDUHAT ;
    njeallja:njeallja#      O-LOGIF   ;
 njealljalot:njeallja#lot#  DUHAT     ;
 njealljalot:njeallja#lot#  JUSTDUHAT ;
      vihtta:vihtta#        O-LOGIF   ;
   vihttalot:vihtta#lot#    DUHAT     ;
   vihttalot:vihtta#lot#    JUSTDUHAT ;
      guhtta:guhtta#        O-LOGIF   ;
   guhttalot:guhtta#lot#    DUHAT     ;
   guhttalot:guhtta#lot#    JUSTDUHAT ;
       čieža:čieža#         O-LOGIF   ;
    čiežalot:čieža#lot#     DUHAT     ;
    čiežalot:čieža#lot#     JUSTDUHAT ;
       gieža:gieža#         O-LOGIF   ;
    giežalot:gieža#lot#     DUHAT     ;
    giežalot:gieža#lot#     JUSTDUHAT ;
      gávcci:gávcci#        O-LOGIF   ;
   gávccilot:gávcci#lot#    DUHAT     ;
   gávccilot:gávcci#lot#    JUSTDUHAT ;
       ovcci:ovcci#         O-LOGIF   ;
    ovccilot:ovcci#lot#     DUHAT     ;
    ovccilot:ovcci#lot#     JUSTDUHAT ;
LEXICON O-NL   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
    nuppelohkái:nuppe#lohkái#    JUSTDUHAT ;
    nuppelohkái:nuppe#lohkái#    DUHAT     ;
       nuppelot:nuppe#loh9#      JUSTDUHAT ;
       nuppelot:nuppe#loh9#      DUHAT     ;
    goalmmátlot:goalmmát#lot#    JUSTDUHAT ;
    goalmmátlot:goalmmát#lot#    DUHAT     ;
 njealjátlohkái:njealját#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
 njealjátlohkái:njealját#lohkái# DUHAT     ;
    njealjátlot:njealját#loh9#   JUSTDUHAT ;
    njealjátlot:njealját#loh9#   DUHAT     ;
       viđátlot:viđát#lot#       JUSTDUHAT ;
       viđátlot:viđát#lot#       DUHAT     ;
    guđátlohkái:guđát#lohkái#    JUSTDUHAT ;
    guđátlohkái:guđát#lohkái#    DUHAT     ;
       guđátlot:guđát#loh9#      JUSTDUHAT ;
       viđatlot:viđat#lot#       JUSTDUHAT ;
       viđatlot:viđat#lot#       DUHAT     ;
       guđatlot:guđat#loh9#      JUSTDUHAT ;
       guđatlot:guđat#loh9#      DUHAT     ;
  gávccátlohkái:gávccát#lohkái#  JUSTDUHAT ;
  gávccátlohkái:gávccát#lohkái#  DUHAT     ;
      ovccátlot:ovccát#lot#      JUSTDUHAT ;
      ovccátlot:ovccát#lot#      DUHAT     ;
       logátlot:logát#loh9#      JUSTDUHAT ;
       logátlot:logát#loh9#      DUHAT     ;
LEXICON O-CUODI   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Hundreds of thousands
        čuođiguokte:čuođi#guokte#         JUSTDUHAT  ;
        čuođivihtta:čuođi#vihtta#         JUSTDUHAT  ;
        čuođigávcci:čuođi#gávcci#         JUSTDUHAT  ;
        čuođiguokte:čuođi#guokte#         DUHAT      ;
        čuođivihtta:čuođi#vihtta#         DUHAT      ;
        čuođigávcci:čuođi#gávcci#         DUHAT      ;
              čuođi:čuođi#                O-LOGIF    ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
              čuođi:čuođi#                O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
     oktačuohtiakta:okta#čuohti#akta#     JUSTDUHAT  ;
 oktačuohtinjeallja:okta#čuohti#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT  ;
    oktačuohtigieža:okta#čuohti#gieža#    JUSTDUHAT  ;
     oktačuohtiakta:okta#čuohti#akta#     DUHAT      ;
 oktačuohtinjeallja:okta#čuohti#njeallja# DUHAT      ;
    oktačuohtigieža:okta#čuohti#gieža#    DUHAT      ;
         oktačuohti:okta#čuohti#          O-LOGIF    ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
         oktačuohti:okta#čuohti#          O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
             čuohti:čuohti#               JUSTDUHAT  ; ! 100000
             čuohti:čuohti#               DUHAT      ; ! 100000
       čuohtigolbma:čuohti#golbma#        JUSTDUHAT  ;
       čuohtiguhtta:čuohti#guhtta#        JUSTDUHAT  ;
        čuohtiovcci:čuohti#ovcci#         JUSTDUHAT  ;
       čuohtigolbma:čuohti#golbma#        DUHAT      ;
       čuohtiguhtta:čuohti#guhtta#        DUHAT      ;
        čuohtiovcci:čuohti#ovcci#         DUHAT      ;
             čuohti:čuohti#               O-LOGIF    ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
             čuohti:čuohti#               O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
LEXICON CUODI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                        čuođi:čuođi#                ONLY_CMP         ;
                   oktačuohti:okta#čuohti#          ONLY_CMP         ;
                       čuohti:čuohti#               ONLY_CMP         ;
LEXICON num-imprecise   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Imprecise numbers
                                       moaddenuppelohkái:moadde#nuppe#lohkái#                       DUHAT                 ;
                                               gallelogi:galle#logi#                                DUHAT                 ;
